North Carolina, session 2025, HB189.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-158 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(f) The following requirements apply to a traffic control photographic system used to
enforce this section:
(1) A violation detected by a traffic control photographic system is defined as
when a vehicle enters and proceeds into the intersection after the onset of the
signal display of a steady circular red or steady red arrow controlling traffic
approaching the intersection and the applicable red clearance interval has
expired. All signals with traffic control photographic systems must be
designed with an appropriate red clearance interval.
(2) The duration of the yellow light change interval and the red clearance interval
at intersections where traffic control photographic systems are in use shall be
no less than the yellow light change interval and the red clearance interval
durations specified on the traffic signal plan of record signed and sealed by a
professional engineer, licensed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter
89C of the General Statutes, and shall comply with the provisions of the most
recently adopted Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices."
SECTION 2. This act is effective 60 days after it becomes law and applies to any
enforcement of G.S. 20-158 by a traffic control photographic system, including by any
municipality authorized under G.S. 160A-300.1, and S.L. 2001-286, as amended.
*H189-v-1*